Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 25 Narragansett Bay Commission
46-25-22.1.
Shut off of water supply for nonpayment of sewer user fees, charges, and assessments.

Notwithstanding the provision of §

46-25-22

, the commission is authorized to order any water supplier which services any person assessed by the commission pursuant to §

46-25-22

to terminate the water supply service of any person for nonpayment of sewer user fees, charges, and assessments. The commission will abide by the rules and regulations of the public utilities commission governing water shut-offs.

Upon notification by the commission to terminate service, the water supplier shall within fourteen (14) days terminate said service and notify the commission that said termination has occurred. Upon notification by the commission, the water supplier shall restore the water supply in accordance with the water supplier’s policy on water supply restoration.

The commission shall have the authority to assess any person any fees, charges and assessments affiliated with the shut off and restoration of service.

When service is provided to a residence occupied by a tenant, the tenant may, after paying the fees, charges and assessments in order to restore or prevent termination of service, deduct the amount paid from the rent due the landlord. The tenant shall provide the landlord with a copy of the receipt from the commission when making a deduction from the rent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 60, § 1.

46-25-23.
Repealed.

46-25-24.
Appropriation of revenues.

Except as provided in §

46-25-18

, all moneys received by the commission for the use of the facilities of the project, shall be paid over to the executive director of the commission and deposited by him or her in the fund. All moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated, in addition to all other sums appropriated by the provisions of this chapter, to be expended by the commission for administration and all other expenses relating to the planning, constructing, equipping, operation, and maintenance of the project. Any unexpended balance remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried forward and made available for expenditure in the succeeding fiscal years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 397, § 1.

46-25-24.1.
Notice of entry.

Authorized agents and employees of the commission may enter upon any lands, waters and premises in the district for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, test pits, drillings, borings and examinations as the commission may deem necessary for the purposes of the Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission, and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass, nor shall an entry for such purposes be deemed an entry under any condemnation proceedings which may be then pending. The commission shall give at least fifteen (15) days notice of its intent to enter such lands, waters or premises to the record owner(s) of the property and to the municipality wherein the property lies, and shall state in that notice the amount it proposes to pay as just compensation for such entry. Following such entry, the commission shall pay the amount of compensation previously proposed, and restore the property to its prior condition or shall reimburse the owner for any actual damage resulting to such lands, waters and premises as a result of such activities. If the owner of said lands believes that the amount paid is insufficient to provide just compensation, the owner may petition to the superior court to have the amount increased. The provisions of this section shall in no way expand the powers of the commission to take any of the properties investigated by eminent domain. Amounts to be paid as just compensation pursuant to this section shall be set by the commission in accordance with §

42-35-1

et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 219, § 1.

46-25-25.
Orders as to pretreatment of sewage.

Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority hereby vested in the commission shall include the authority to limit, reject, or prohibit any direct or indirect discharge of pollutants or combination of pollutants, as defined by applicable federal or state law, into the facilities of the project; to require that any person or class of user shall cause pollutants from his or her property, prior to their entry into the facilities of the project, to be submitted to such pretreatment standards and requirements as the commission may prescribe by rule or regulation. The commission shall prescribe such rules and regulations for pretreatment as in the opinion of the commission:

Are required by applicable federal or state law,

Are required under the terms of the project’s federal permit(s), or

Are necessary and appropriate for the project.

The commission shall have the authority to issue or deny permits to any person for the direct or indirect discharge of any pollutants into the facilities of the project; to require the development of a compliance schedule by each person to insure compliance with such pretreatment as the commission may prescribe. No person shall discharge any pollutant into the facilities, except as in compliance with the provisions of this section, and any rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, and pursuant to the terms and conditions of a permit.

The commission may, by regulation, order, permit, or otherwise require any person who discharges into the facilities of the project to:

Establish and maintain such records;

Make such reports;

Install, calibrate, use, and maintain such monitoring equipment or methods, including where appropriate, biological monitoring methods;

Sample such discharges and effluents, in accordance with such methods, at such locations, at such intervals, and in such manner as the commission shall prescribe; and

Provide such other information relating to discharges into the facilities of the project as the commission may reasonably require to insure compliance with prescribed pretreatment. The information shall include, but not be limited to, those records, reports, and procedures required by applicable federal law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commission shall have the authority, and shall prescribe the appropriate procedures, after informal notice to the discharger, immediately and effectively to halt or prevent any discharge of pollutants into the facilities of the project which reasonably appears to present an imminent endangerment to the health or welfare of persons. Halting or preventing may include, but shall not be limited to, physically plugging and/or blocking the discharger’s connection to the facilities of the project. The commission shall also have the authority, and shall prescribe the appropriate procedures, which shall include notice to the affected discharger and an opportunity to respond, to hold, or prevent any discharge into the facilities of the project which presents or may present an endangerment to the environment or which threatens to interfere with the operation of the project. Procedures prescribed under this subsection which comply in form with those provided in §

42-17.1-2(21)

shall be deemed to be appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 404, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 31.

46-25-25.1.
Inspection powers.

The commission is authorized to carry out all inspection, surveillance, and monitoring procedures necessary to determine, independent of information supplied by any person who discharges into the facilities of the project, compliance or noncompliance by the person with the pretreatment requirements prescribed by the commission.

The commission or the duly authorized employees and agents of the commission, upon presenting identification and appropriate credentials, are authorized:

To enter, without delay and at reasonable times, those premises (public or private) of any person or class of user, either receiving services from the commission or applying to services from the commission, in which a discharge source or treatment system is located or in which records required to be maintained pursuant to §

46-25-25

, are kept;

During regular working hours and at other reasonable times, and within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, to have access to and to copy any records, inspect any monitoring equipment or method required pursuant to §

46-25-25

, and sample any effluents which the owner or operator of the discharge source is required to sample under § 46-25-25, and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

Any person obstructing, hindering, or in any way causing to be obstructed or hindered the commission or any of its employees or agents in the performance of their duties, or who shall refuse to permit the commission or any of its employees or agents entrance into any premises, buildings, plant, or equipment, or other places belonging to or controlled by the person, in the performance of his or her duties as such, shall be subject to the civil and criminal penalties set forth in §§

46-25-25.2

and

46-25-25.3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 366, § 2.

46-25-25.2.
Civil penalties.

Any person who shall violate the provisions of §§

46-25-25

—

46-25-25.3

, or of any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant thereto, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day for each violation.

The commission shall, in the same manner as cities and towns authorized under the provisions of §

45-6-2.3(a)(4)

, issue regulations to obtain actual costs and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the commission in seeking compliance, penalties, or damages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 366, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 478; P.L. 1988, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 448, § 1.

46-25-25.3.
Criminal penalties.

Any person who shall be found guilty of violating, willfully or with criminal negligence, any of the provisions of §§

46-25-25

—

46-25-25.3

or of any permit, rule, or regulation issued pursuant thereto, or an order of the commission, shall be punished by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both a fine or imprisonment; and every person shall be deemed guilty of a separate and distinct offense for each day during which the violation shall be repeated or continued. Further, the person shall be liable for all damages directly related to the violation, including additional costs of handling and treating any prohibited wastes, and shall reimburse the commission for actual enforcement costs incurred by the commission, including reasonable attorney’s fees and administrative costs.

No person shall knowingly make any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under §

46-25-25

or

46-25-25.1

or by any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued under those sections, or shall falsify, tamper with, or knowingly render inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under those sections or by any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued under those sections.

No person shall discharge into any outlet within the district any sewage waste or other pollutants without a permit, except where suitable treatment has been provided in accordance with this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commission.

No person shall construct or maintain any privy, privy vault, septic tank, cesspool, or other facility intended or used for the disposal of sewage waste or other pollutants within the district, except as otherwise provided by law or the rules and regulations of the commission.

No person shall maliciously, willfully, or negligently breach, damage, destroy, uncover, deface, or tamper with any structure, appurtenance, or equipment or dump garbage, refuse, or other material on land or right-of-way which is a part of the facilities of the project.

No person shall uncover, make any connection with, or opening into, use, alter, or disturb any interceptor or appurtenance thereof, without first obtaining a written permit from the commission.

No person shall discharge or cause to be discharged any unpolluted waters such as stormwater, groundwater, roof runoff, subsurface drainage, uncontaminated cooling water, or unpolluted industrial process waters to any facilities of the project other than those discharges as are connected to an existing (prior to May 1, 1982) combined sewer in those areas in which a combined sewer is the only available means for disposal of unpolluted waters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 366, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 478, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 448, § 1.

46-25-25.4.
Enforcement authority and procedure.

The commission shall have authority to seek legal or equitable relief in the federal court or in the superior court of Providence county to enforce the requirements of §§ 307(b) and (c), 402(b)(8) and other applicable sections of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, also known as the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., and any regulations implementing those sections or authorized by this chapter and/or by chapter 12 of this title. Whenever, on the basis of any information available to the commission, the commission has reasonable grounds to believe that a person has violated any provision of §§

46-25-25

through

46-25-25.6

or any permit, rule, regulation or order issued pursuant thereto the commission may institute administrative, civil or criminal proceedings in the name of the commission. The commission shall not be required to enter into any recognizance or to give surety for costs prior to instituting such proceedings. The commission has the authority to order any person who violates any provision of §§

46-25-25

through

46-25-25.6

, any permit, rule, regulation or order issued pursuant thereto to cease and desist the violation, or to remedy the violation and to impose administrative penalties. The commission may impose administrative penalties only in accordance with the notice and hearing provisions of §§

42-35-1

et seq., and 46-25-25, and the commission’s rules and regulations. It shall be the duty of the attorney general to carry out all such criminal proceedings initiated by the commission.

The superior court for Providence County shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of §§

46-25-25

—

46-25-25.6

, and any rule, regulation, permit, or administrative order issued pursuant thereto. Proceedings for enforcement may be instituted and prosecuted in the name of the commission. In any proceeding on which injunctive relief is sought, it shall not be necessary for the commission to show that without that relief, the injury which will result will be irreparable or that the remedy at law is inadequate. Proceedings provided in this section shall be in addition to and may be utilized in lieu, of other administrative or judicial proceedings authorized by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 366, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 448, § 1.

46-25-25.5.
Public access to information.

Any permit, or permit application, or effluent data shall be available to the public for inspection and copying.

Other records, reports, or information obtained under this section also may be made available to the public for inspection and copying, provided, that upon a showing, satisfactory to the commission, by any person that the records, reports, or information or any part thereof, except as provided in subsection (a), would, if made public, divulge methods or processes entitled to protection as trade secrets of the person, the commission shall consider, treat, and protect the record, report, or information, or part thereof, as confidential; provided, however, that the record, report, or information accorded confidential treatment may be disclosed or transmitted to other officers, employees, or authorized representatives of this state or of the United States concerned with carrying out §

46-25-25

et seq., or when relevant in any proceeding under those sections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 366, § 2.

46-25-25.6.
Municipal ordinances.

Any municipality within the district, which has connected or connects its sewers with the facilities of the project, shall adopt appropriate rules and regulations, pertaining to sewer usage, no less restrictive than the rules and regulations pertaining to sewer usage so adopted by the commission. The municipal rules and regulations shall include procedures for monitoring and enforcing compliance, and shall be submitted to the commission prior to their adoption. The commission shall have the authority to refuse service or connection to any municipality that fails to comply with this section.

The commission shall retain the authority to seek judicial relief for noncompliance by affected dischargers when any municipality has failed to seek that relief, or when the municipality has acted to seek that relief but has sought a penalty which the commission finds to be insufficient. Nothing in this section shall in any way limit the authority granted the commission under §§

46-25-25

—

46-25-25.4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 366, § 2.

46-25-26.
Rules and regulations — Notice of rule review.

The commission may adopt rules and regulations, or any amendment to existing rules and regulations, according to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42. The commission shall also give notice thereof, prior to the effective date thereof, by sending, by registered or certified mail, a copy thereof to each person interested therein who shall have registered with the commission his or her name and address, with a request to be so notified. Review of those rules may be had as provided in chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-27.
Notice of rate hearings.

Notice of proposed user charges and fees shall be provided for in the manner set forth in title 39, pursuant to the regulations of the public utilities commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 235, § 1.

46-25-28.
Conduct of hearings.

At all hearings held under the provisions of this chapter, the commission and the members thereof, shall have the right to administer oaths. All persons testifying at the hearings shall do so under oath and under penalty of perjury. The commission shall have the right to issue subpoenas to compel the appearance of witnesses and/or the production of any books, records, or other documents. Any person may be represented by counsel at the hearing. The commission may adjourn the hearings from time to time, whenever the adjournment shall, in its opinion, be necessary or desirable. The testimony adduced at the hearing shall be transcribed by a stenographer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-29.
Notice of decisions by commission.

Within a reasonable time following the conclusion of the hearing, the commission shall render its decision and findings and shall give notice thereof by publication in some newspaper published in the county of Providence, and by mailing a copy thereof by registered or certified mail to each person interested therein who shall have registered with the commission his or her name and address with a request to be so notified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-30.
Review of decisions.

Any person aggrieved by any decision may obtain a judicial review thereof in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-31.
Notice of hearings on orders.

Before adopting or entering any order applicable to any one or more specific persons, the commission shall give to each of the persons, by registered or certified mail, twenty (20) days’ notice in writing of the time and place of a hearing to be afforded each of the persons should he or she or it desire the hearing. The notice shall state the time and place of the holding of the hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-32.
Procedure for hearings on orders.

The provisions of §§

46-25-27

—

46-25-30

relative to hearings and judicial review, shall be applicable to all hearings and decisions under §

46-25-31

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-33.
Commission expenses as cost of project.

The expenses of the commission in the performance of its duties hereunder shall be construed to be costs of operation and maintenance of the project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-34.
Cooperation and coordination with other agencies.

In the performance of its duties hereunder, the commission shall be entitled to ask for and to receive from the Providence water supply board or any other commission, board, officer, or agency of the state, such information, cooperation, assistance and advice as shall be reasonable and proper in view of the nature of the functions. Each municipality within the district shall make available to the commission the names and addresses of the users of sewage services within the municipality, and shall assist the commission in providing administrative support for the billing of users at a reasonable cost to the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 309, § 3.

46-25-35.
Legislative recommendations.

The commission may, from time to time, recommend to the general assembly the advisability of the enactment of any legislation relating to the project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-36.
Liberal construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be construed liberally in order to accomplish the purposes hereof, and where any specific power is given to the commission by the provisions hereof, the statement thereof shall not be deemed to exclude or impair any power otherwise in this chapter conferred upon the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-37.
Bonds authorized — Maturity — Certification and endorsement.

The general treasurer is hereby authorized and empowered, with the approval of the governor and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, to issue, from time to time, bonds in the name and behalf of the state, and in such amounts as may be specified, from time to time, by the governor in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed eighty-seven million, seven hundred thousand dollars ($87,700,000) to be designated as “Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission loan of 1980”. The bonds shall be in denominations of one thousand dollars ($1,000) each, or multiples thereof, and shall be payable in any coin or currency of the United States, which at the time of payment shall be legal tender for public or private debts. The bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times not exceeding twenty (20) years from their respective date of issue, bear interest payable semiannually at such rate or different varying rates, be payable at such time or times, at such place or places, be subject to such terms of recall or redemption, with or without premium, be in such form with or without interest coupons attached carrying such registration, conversion, reconversion, transfer, debt requirement, acceleration, and other provisions as may be fixed by the general treasurer, with the approval of the governor, upon each issue of the bonds at the time of each issue.

Whenever the governor shall approve the issuance of the bonds, he or she shall certify the approval to the secretary of state; the general treasurer shall countersign the bonds and affix the seal of the state. The approval of the governor shall be endorsed on each bond so approved with a facsimile of his or her signature.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-38.
Proceeds: Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission fund.

The general treasurer is hereby directed to deposit the proceeds of the sale of the bonds, including any premium or premiums and any accrued interest which may be received from the sale thereof, in one or more of the depositories in which the funds of the state may be lawfully kept, in the account to be known as “Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission fund”, to be used as follows:

For the project within the district;

As prescribed in §

46-25-42

, in the case of premiums or accrued interest,

In the event that the amount received from the sale of the bonds exceeds the amount necessary for the planning, construction, extension, and improvement of the project, the surplus shall be used to the extent possible to retire the bonds as they may become due,

Provided, however, that six million dollars ($6,000,000) of the proceeds of the fund may be utilized for the purposes of the Blackstone Valley sewer district and an additional nine million dollars ($9,000,000) of the proceeds may be utilized for the purposes of the Pawtuxet River district commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 434, art. 2, § 2.

46-25-38.1.
Narragansett Bay environmental enforcement fund.

There is hereby established a separate fund within the “Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission fund” to be called the “Narragansett Bay environmental enforcement fund”. This fund shall be administered by the executive director of the commission. The fund shall consist of such sums as the commission may, from time to time, deposit, or the sums recovered by any administrative or civil enforcement action brought under the authority of this chapter. All interest earned on the sums shall become part of the fund. All sums in the fund shall be expended in accordance with §

46-25-24

for the purposes set forth below:

Emergency response activities. These activities shall include, but not be limited to, site inspections, investigatory reports, collection, monitoring, and analysis of samples of wastewater, air and/or soil waste disposal or spill response, analysis, and containment.

Enforcement activities. These funds may also be used to support activities related to enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, regarding illegal discharges and spills to the facilities, including, but not limited to, legal activities to enforce the provisions of this chapter and secure contributions from violators as well as ancillary services, personnel, or equipment to support the activities enumerated in this section.

Additional activities. These activities shall include, but not be limited to, professional and emergency response training for employees, environmental research and development projects, public information and education, and technical assistance provided by the commission to any state, federal, or municipal agency.

Bay bond debt retirement. Those funds which have not been committed for projects within a three (3) year period following their deposit into the fund may be used to pay the long term debt service on bonds issued pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 397, § 1.

46-25-39.
Temporary notes.

The general treasurer is hereby authorized and empowered, with the approval of the governor, and in accordance with provisions of this chapter, to borrow upon temporary notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of the bonds, from time to time, in the name and behalf of the state, sums of money for the purposes set forth in §

46-25-4

.

The notes shall be signed by the general treasurer and countersigned by the secretary of state, and shall be issued at such time or times in such amounts, at such rates of interest, with such provisions of prepayment, with or without premium, acceleration, and other terms as may be fixed by the general treasurer, with the approval of the governor.

The notes may be issued from time to time for periods not exceeding two (2) years, and may be refunded or renewed from time to time, by the issue of other notes for periods not exceeding two (2) years, but the notes, including all refundings and renewals thereof, shall bear maturity dates not later than five (5) years from the date of each original issue. The total sum of the terms of the notes plus the term of the bonds, which the issuance of the notes anticipate, shall not exceed twenty-five (25) years in duration.

The proceeds of the sale of the notes, inclusive of any premiums and any accrued interest which may be received from the sale thereof, shall be applied to the purposes for which the notes are issued, and shall be deposited by the general treasurer in the account described in §

46-25-38

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-40.
Advances from general fund in anticipation of the issue of notes or bonds.

The general treasurer is authorized, from time to time, with the approval of the governor, in the anticipation of the issue of notes or bonds under the authority of this chapter, to advance to the fund, to be used for the purposes specified in §

46-25-38

, any funds of the state not specifically held for any purpose; provided, however, that all the advances shall be returned to the general fund forthwith upon the receipt by the fund of proceeds from the issue of notes or bonds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-41.
Bonds and notes tax exempt general obligations of state.

All bonds and notes issued under the authority of this chapter shall be exempt from taxation in the state and shall be general obligations of the state, and the full faith and credit of the state are hereby pledged for the due payment of the principal and the interest on each of the bonds and notes as the bonds and notes shall become due.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-42.
Terms and conditions of sales — Applications of premiums and accrued interest — Validity not affected by change in office.

Any bond or note issued under the authority of this chapter shall be sold from time to time at not less than the principal amount thereof, on such terms and conditions as the general treasurer, with the approval of the governor, shall be deemed to be for the best interest of the state. The purchaser of any of the bonds or notes shall pay accrued interest to the date of delivery of the bonds or notes.

Any premiums or accrued interest, which may be received as the result of the sale of bonds or notes, shall be applied to the payment of debt service costs.

Any bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this chapter and any coupons on any bonds, if properly executed by the manual or facsimile signature, as the case may be, of officers of the state in office on the date of execution, shall be valid and binding according to their tenor, notwithstanding that, before the delivery thereof and payment therefor, any or all of the officers shall for any reason have ceased to hold office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-43.
Investment of receipt pending expenditures.

All moneys in the fund, not immediately required for payment pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, may be invested by the state investment commission, as established by chapter 10 of title 35, pursuant to the provisions of that chapter; provided, however, that the securities in which the fund is invested shall remain a part of the funds, as shall other securities for which the funds may from time to time, pursuant to that chapter, be exchanged, and provided, further, that the income from the investment shall become part of the fund, and shall be used to the extent possible to pay debt service costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-44.
Payment of bond issue expenses, interest, and principal.

For the purpose of paying any expenses incurred by the general treasurer in the issuance of the bonds or notes under the authority of this chapter, and any interest and any principal becoming payable, from time to time on the bonds or notes issued under the authority of this chapter and then outstanding, the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the expenses, interest, and principal out of the fund. In the event that the amount available in the fund is not sufficient for this purpose, a sum sufficient is hereby annually appropriated out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated for the payment of the expenses, interest, and principal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-45.
Appropriation.

For the purpose of paying initial expenses of administration and operation of the commission, there is hereby appropriated, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much thereof as may be required, from time to time, upon receipt by the controller of proper vouchers signed by the director of the department of administration and approved by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-46.
Repealed.

46-25-47.
Applicability of election laws.

All laws relating to elections, as set forth in title 17 as amended, shall as far as consistent herewith, apply to the election authorized hereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-48.
Termination of existence of commission.

If the people shall reject the proposition submitted to referendum under the provisions of §

46-25-46

, the existence of the commission shall terminate on June 30, 1981, unless its existence is extended by the general assembly, and all its rights and properties shall pass as provided in §

46-25-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-49.
Severability.

If any provisions of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, or order made thereunder, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter, rule, regulation, or order, and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of this chapter, and it is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this chapter would have been enacted if the invalid parts had not been included therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-50.
Authority to borrow in anticipation of user fees or state or federal funds.

Pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the commission is hereby authorized and empowered, with the approval of the governor, to borrow in anticipation of the receipt of user fees or state or federal funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 91, § 2.

46-25-51.
Commission notes.

Money borrowed by the commission pursuant to §

46-25-50

shall be evidenced by notes. The principal and interest of all notes of the commission issued in anticipation of the receipts of state or federal funds shall be payable no later than the fourth anniversary of the date of issue thereof, and shall be payable from state or federal funds which the commission reasonably anticipates receiving or any other funds either legally available to the commission or appropriated for that purpose. The principal and interest of all notes of the commission, issued in anticipation of user fees, shall be payable within one year of the date of issue thereof and may be renewed, and the principal amount of the notes shall not exceed in the aggregate eighty percent (80%) of the actual receipts received by the commission from user fees in its next prior fiscal year.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, all notes shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of the state of Rhode Island, subject only to the provisions for registration contained therein.

The notes or any issue thereof shall be in a form and contain such other provisions as the commission may determine, and the notes or resolutions or proceedings authorizing the notes or any issue thereof may contain, in addition to any provisions, conditions, covenants, or limitations authorized by this chapter, any provisions, conditions, covenants, or limitations which the commission is authorized to include in any resolution or resolutions authorizing notes.

The commission may issue such notes in such manner, either publicly or privately, on such terms as it may determine to be in its best interest. The notes may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, or agency of the state, without any other proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this chapter, and by the provisions and resolutions authorizing the issuance of the notes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 399, § 1.

46-25-52.
Security for notes.

The principal of and interest on any notes issued by the commission may be secured by a pledge of the general credit of the commission.

Any resolution under which notes of the commission are authorized to be used (and any trust indenture established thereby) may contain provisions for vesting in a trustee, or paying agent, such properties, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the commission may determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 91, § 2.

46-25-53.
Exemption from taxation.

The commission shall not be required to pay state taxes of any kind, and the commission, its projects, property, and moneys and, except for estate, inheritance, and gift taxes, any notes issued under the provisions of this chapter, and the income (including gain from sale or exchange) therefrom, shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state and by the municipalities and all political subdivisions of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 91, § 2.

46-25-54.
Notes as legal investments.

The notes of the commission are hereby made securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state, and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever, who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 91, § 2.